11724/HW2/somali.foma
define Vowel [a|e|i|o|u];
define C [m|n|t|k|q|b|d|ɖ|ʔ|ɡ|d⁀ʒ|f|s|ʃ|x|ħ|h|ʕ|l|j|r|w];
define Voiced [d|b|ɖ|g];
define Voiceless [ɣ|ð|ʐ];
define LenitionD d -> ð || Vowel _ Vowel;
define LenitionB b -> β || Vowel _ Vowel;
define Lenetionɖ ɖ -> ʐ || Vowel _ Vowel;
define LenetionG g -> ɣ || Vowel _ Vowel;
define Lenetion LenitionD .o. LenitionB .o. Lenetionɖ .o. LenetionG;
define TDeletionD t -> [] || d _;
define TDeletionɖ t -> [] || ɖ _;
define TDeletion TDeletionD .o. TDeletionɖ;
define LTtoʃ lt -> ʃ;
define MtoN m -> n || _ t;
define NtoL n -> l || l _ ;
define VowelInsertionA [..] -> a || a C _ C C;
define VowelInsertionE [..] -> e || e C _ C C;
define VowelInsertionI [..] -> i || i C _ C C;
define VowelInsertionO [..] -> o || o C _ C C;
define VowelInsertionU [..] -> u || u C _ C C;
define VowelInsertion VowelInsertionI .o. VowelInsertionE .o. VowelInsertionA .o. VowelInsertionO .o. VowelInsertionU;
read regex VowelInsertion .o. Lenetion .o. LTtoʃ .o. MtoN .o. NtoL .o. TDeletion;

apply down gaʕmta
apply down laamta
apply down laamo
apply down simo
apply down d⁀ʒid
apply down bagl
apply down jirdta
apply down kefedta
apply down boholta
apply down baɣalta
apply down naago
apply down ʔulta
apply down hadaltaj
apply down sabo
apply down feeɖo
apply down gabɖta
apply down sugaj
apply down sidtaj
apply down irbadta
apply down qosoltaj
apply up gaʕanta
apply up laanta
apply up laamo
apply up simo
apply up d⁀ʒid
apply up baɣal
apply up jirida
apply up kefeda
apply up bohoʃa
apply up baɣaʃa
apply up naaɣo
apply up ʔuʃa
apply up haðaʃaj
apply up saβo
apply up feeʐo
apply up gaβaɖa
apply up suɣaj
apply up sidaj
apply up irbada
apply up qosoʃaj
